Illinois, session 104th, HB5457.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Home Construction Cost Reduction Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative intent. The General Assembly 7recognizes the common public interest in promoting 8homeownership, protecting working families, advancing 9regulatory transparency, protecting public safety, and 10reducing the cost of constructing single-family homes in 11Illinois by: 12        (1) limiting Illinois-specific construction of energy 13    modules that exceed the standards of the United States 14    Department of Housing and Urban Development or the 15    International Residential Code; 16        (2) preventing unnecessary regulatory expansion; 17        (3) requiring clear disclosure of cost impacts; and 18        (4) providing fee relief for the construction of 19    starter homes. 20    Section 10. Applicability. This Act applies only to 21single-family homes and within zoning districts that allow 22single-family homes. This Act neither requires nor authorizes   HB5457- 2 -LRB104 16663 RTM 30067 b1duplexes, multifamily homes, accessory dwelling units, town 2homes, or increased residential density. Moreover, this Act 3does not compel a municipality to allow any form of 4multifamily construction and it does not override existing 5zoning districts, historic districts, or overlay or 6subdivision requirements. 7    Section 15. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Factory-built home" includes modular, manufactured, and 9panelized homes that comply with a national building safety 10code. 11    "Session day" means a calendar day in which either chamber 12of the Illinois General Assembly is scheduled to convene in 13regular session, veto session, special session, or joint 14session.15    "Housing cost impact statement" means the cost analysis 16required for new regulations. 17    "National building safety code" means a set of safety 18standards produced by a national or multinational entity that 19has been adopted as a standard by states and units of local 20government in the United States. "National building safety 21code" includes, but is not limited to, the Manufactured Home 22Construction Safety Code established by the United States 23Department of Housing and Urban Development and the 24International Building Code and the International Residential 25Code established by the International Code Council.  HB5457- 3 -LRB104 16663 RTM 30067 b1    "Single-family home" means a detached, single-family 2residential structure. 3    "Starter home" means a single-family home containing not 4more than 1,600 square feet of heated living space. 5    Section 20. Factory-built home acceptance with local 6architectural control. A municipality may not prohibit 7factory-built single-family homes that comply with:8        (1) a national building safety code;9        (2) rules adopted by State agencies that satisfy the 10    requirements of this Act; and11        (3) all local architectural, aesthetic, and design 12    standards applicable to site-built homes in the same 13    district. 14    Section 25. Material neutrality. A municipality may not 15prohibit the use of building materials that comply with a 16national building safety code and conform to local design 17standards, including, but not limited to, brick and stone 18ratios, facade requirements, and roof pitch. 19    Section 30. Prerequisites to construction-related 20rulemaking. 21    (a) A State agency may not file for publication in the 22Illinois Register any proposed rule or amendment that would 23impose requirements on home construction that are inconsistent   HB5457- 4 -LRB104 16663 RTM 30067 b1with any national building safety code unless the State agency 2first provides to the Joint Committee on Administrative Rules 3(i) a housing cost impact statement and (ii) a compelling 4public safety concern that would be addressed by the 5additional requirements. This subsection (a) applies to, but 6is not limited to, EV charger readiness mandates, electric 7HVAC-only rules, solar-ready or battery-ready mandates, 8Illinois-only insulation standards, and stormwater 9requirements.10    (b) A State agency may not impose any mandate on a 11factory-built home that is more restrictive than the mandate 12applicable to an on-site constructed single-family home. A 13factory-built home shall be accepted as meeting this State's 14construction standards if it complies with a national building 15safety code and the requirements of this Act. 16    Section 35. House cost impact statements. 17    (a) Before adopting, amending, or implementing any rule, 18regulation, interpretation, or guidance affecting 19single-family homes or factory-built homes, State agencies 20shall prepare a housing cost impact statement. Each housing 21cost impact statement shall include:22        (1) an estimate, in dollars, of how the proposed rule 23    would increase the cost to construct a single-family home 24    or factory-built home;25        (2) an estimate of how the proposed rule would   HB5457- 5 -LRB104 16663 RTM 30067 b1    increase the time required to construct a single-family 2    home or factory-built home;3        (3) a description of how the proposed rule deviates 4    from national building safety codes;5        (4) a description of whether a lower-cost compliance 6    alternative to the proposed rule exists; and7        (5) a description of whether the requirements of the 8    proposed rule would disproportionately affect rural or 9    low-income homebuyers.10    (b) A State agency may not enforce a rule that affects the 11construction of a single-family home that complies with a 12national building safety code unless the State agency provides 13the General Assembly with notice of the rule's adoption. The 14notice must be provided to the General Assembly at least 20 15session days before enforcement. If enforcing the rule is 16estimated to increase the cost to construct a single-family 17home or factory-built home by $3,500 or more, then the notice 18must be provided to the General Assembly at least 40 session 19days before enforcement.20    (c) Each housing cost impact statement shall be:21        (1) published on the State agency's website;22        (2) submitted to the General Assembly; and23        (3) maintained in a publicly accessible archive for no 24    less than 10 years.25    (d) A rule adopted after the effective date of this Act 26without a housing cost impact statement that complies with the   HB5457- 6 -LRB104 16663 RTM 30067 b1requirements of this Section is void. 2    Section 40. Permit timeline. State agencies shall approve 3or deny construction-related permits within 45 days. Failure 4to act within the 45 days shall be deemed as approval of the 5permit. 6    Section 45. Fee reductions and waivers. The State shall 7waive all State-level permitting, inspection, and plan review 8fees for the construction of starter homes. A State agency may 9not increase any permitting, inspection, or plan review fee 10applicable to the construction of single-family homes for 5 11years following the effective date of this Act. A State agency 12may not create, rename, or reclassify any fee to circumvent 13this Section. 14    Section 50. Basement requirements. A municipality may 15approve single-family homes with single-grade or other 16non-basement designs if the designs are consistent with (i) a 17national building safety code and (ii) standard engineering 18practices. 19    Section 55. Licensure, training, or inspection mandates. 20State agencies may not add new certifications, licenses, 21specialty inspections, or training requirements that exceed 22the requirements of national building safety codes.   HB5457- 7 -LRB104 16663 RTM 30067 b1    Section 60. Private cause of action; existing remedies. 2Neither this Act nor any rules adopted under this Act:3        (1) provide a private cause of action for damages or 4    create a standard of care, obligation, or duty that 5    provides a basis for a private cause of action for 6    damages; or 7        (2) abrogate a statutory or common law cause of 8    action, administrative remedy, or defense otherwise 9    available and existing before the effective date of this 10    Act. 11    Section 65. Anti-speculation and local option protections. 12A municipality may, by ordinance, provide for an expedited 13permitting process or otherwise expedite the approval of an 14applicant's permit to construct a single-family home if the 15applicant intends to own and occupy the property. 16    Section 70. Rulemaking restriction. 17    (a) State agencies shall not reinterpret, expand, or 18modify this Act through administrative rulemaking or by 19redesignating mandates as guidelines. State agencies shall not 20issue interpretations, technical advisories, informal 21policies, or non-rulemaking directives with the intention or 22result of subverting this Act.23    (b) A State agency may not condition inspections or the   HB5457- 8 -LRB104 16663 RTM 30067 b1approval of permits on compliance with requirements that 2exceed any national building safety code, unless the 3requirements are imposed by a rule adopted in compliance with 4this Act.5    (c) State agencies shall repeal any rule, mandate, or 6requirement that exceeds all national building safety codes 7within 18 months after the effective date of this Act. The 8Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall publish 9a public list of repealed mandates.10    (d) Any directive issued in violation of this Section is 11void. 12    Section 75. Annual report from the Department of Commerce 13and Economic Opportunity. 14    (a) On or before January 31 of each year, the Department of 15Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall submit a written 16report to the General Assembly, which shall include:17        (1) an estimate, in dollars, of how much the Act has 18    reduced the cost to build a single-family home;19        (2) the number of fees waivers granted because of the 20    Act;21        (3) the number of housing cost impact statements 22    produced by State agencies;23        (4) an estimate of the number of mandates avoided 24    because of the Act;25        (5) a summary of State agency compliance with the Act;   HB5457- 9 -LRB104 16663 RTM 30067 b1    and2        (6) recommendations for modifications to the Act, 3    including extending the repeal date of the Act.4    (b) The report issued under this Section shall not exceed 53 pages. 6    Section 95. Repeal. This Act is repealed 5 years after the 7effective date of this Act. 8    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 9severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.